Tennessee, session 114, SB0543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-16-103(c), is amended by
deleting the second sentence of the subsection and substituting:
A litigation financier that is not a business entity or partnership may amend or
withdraw its registration with the secretary of state by filing a form prescribed by
the secretary of state, along with a filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0543
000680
- 1 -